Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF998.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin HENNEPIN COUNTY; HENNEPIN AVENUE SUSPENSION BRIDGE RECONSTRUCTION.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $8,600,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds account in the state transportation fund to the commissioner of transportation in accordance with Minnesota Statutes, section 174.50, subdivision 6d, for a grant to Hennepin County for Phase 2 of the reconstruction of the iconic and historic Hennepin Avenue Suspension Bridge and approach bridges in the city of Minneapolis. This appropriation may be used for design engineering, construction engineering, and reconstruction of the three bridges. This appropriation may also be used for roadway approach work identified within the project limits, including right-of-way acquisition, design, construction engineering, and construction. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the state transportation fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $8,600,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. The proceeds of the bonds, except accrued interest and any premium received on the sale of the bonds, must be credited to the bond proceeds account in the state transportation fund. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end